stCoCServer/stCoCClient/data/spell/ru-RU/ru-RU.aff
SFX O Y 113
SFX O ий ьего ий
SFX O ий ьему ий
SFX O ий ьим ий
SFX O ий ьем ий
SFX O ий ья ий
SFX O ий ьей ий
SFX O ий ью ий
SFX O ий ье ий
SFX O ий ьи ий
SFX O ий ьих ий
SFX O ий ьими ий
SFX O ень ня ень
SFX O ень ню ень
SFX O ень нем ень
SFX O ень не ень
SFX O ень ни ень
SFX O ень ней ень
SFX O ень ням ень
SFX O ень нями ень
SFX O ень нях ень
SFX O ок ка ок
SFX O ок ку ок
SFX O ок ком ок
SFX O ок ке ок
SFX O ок ки ок
SFX O ок ков ок
SFX O ок кам ок
SFX O ок ками ок
SFX O ок ках ок
SFX O оть тя оть
SFX O оть тю оть
SFX O оть тем оть
SFX O оть те оть
SFX O оть ти оть
SFX O оть тей оть
SFX O оть тям оть
SFX O оть тями оть
SFX O оть тях оть
SFX O ец ца [^аеиол]ец
SFX O ец йца [аеио]ец
SFX O ец ьца лец
SFX O ец цу [^аеиол]ец
SFX O ец йцу [аеио]ец
SFX O ец ьцу лец
SFX O ец йцем [аеи]ец
SFX O ец це [^аеиол]ец
SFX O ец йце [аеио]ец
SFX O ец ьце лец
SFX O ец цы [^аеиол]ец
SFX O ец йцы [аеио]ец
SFX O ец ьцы лец
SFX O 0 ев [анря]ц
SFX O ец йцев [аеи]ец
SFX O ец цам [^аеиол]ец
SFX O ец йцам [аеио]ец
SFX O ец ьцам лец
SFX O ец цами [^аеиол]ец
SFX O ец йцами [аеио]ец
SFX O ец ьцами лец
SFX O ец цах [^аеиол]ец
SFX O ец йцах [аеио]ец
SFX O ец ьцах лец
SFX O ек ка [жчш]ек
SFX O ек ька [лнрс]ек
SFX O ек ку [жчш]ек
SFX O ек ьку [лнрс]ек
SFX O ек ком [жчш]ек
SFX O ек ьком [лнрс]ек
SFX O ек ке [жчш]ек
SFX O ек ьке [лнрс]ек
SFX O ек ки [жчш]ек
SFX O ек ьки [лнрс]ек
SFX O ек ков [жчш]ек
SFX O ек ьков [лнрс]ек
SFX O ек кам [жчш]ек
SFX O ек ькам [лнрс]ек
SFX O ек ками [жчш]ек
SFX O ек ьками [лнрс]ек
SFX O ек ках [жчш]ек
SFX O ек ьках [лнрс]ек
SFX O ел ла ел
SFX O ел лу ел
SFX O ел лом ел
SFX O ел ле ел
SFX O ел лы ел
SFX O ел лов ел
SFX O ел лам ел
SFX O ел лами ел
SFX O ел лах ел
SFX O и ям [абдеилнорсть]и
SFX O и ам [^абдеилнорсть]и
SFX O и ями [абеилнорсь]и
SFX O и ями [арс]ти
SFX O и ами [^абдеилнорсть]и
SFX O и ях [абдеилнорсть]и
SFX O и ах [^абдеилнорсть]и
SFX O ы ам ы
SFX O ы ами ы
SFX O ы ах ы
SFX O 0 м [ая]
SFX O 0 ми [ая]
SFX O 0 х [ая]
SFX O 0 а ин
SFX O 0 у ин
SFX O 0 ом ин
SFX O 0 е ин
SFX O ин е нин
SFX O ин ы рин
SFX O нин н нин
SFX O рин р рин
SFX O ин ам ин
SFX O ин ами ин
SFX O ин ах ин
SFX G Y 46
SFX G 0 а [^ейкоья]
SFX G 0 у [^ейкоья]
SFX G 0 ым [^ежйкоцчшщья]
SFX G 0 е [^ейкоья]
SFX G й го ой
SFX G ий ого ий
SFX G ый ого ый
SFX G й му ой
SFX G ий ому ий
SFX G ый ому ый
SFX G ой им ой
SFX G й м ий
SFX G й м ый
SFX G й м ой
SFX G ий ом ий
SFX G ый ом ый
SFX G ек ка ек
SFX G ек ку ек
SFX G ек ком ек
SFX G ек ке ек
SFX G ок ка ок
SFX G ок ку ок
SFX G ок ком ок
SFX G ок ке ок
SFX G ь я ь
SFX G ь ю ь
SFX G ь ем ь
SFX G ь е ь
SFX G ь и ь
SFX G ь ей ь
SFX G ь ям ь
SFX G ь ями ь
SFX G ь ях ь
SFX G я и я
SFX G я е [^и]я
SFX G я ю я
SFX G я ей я
SFX G я ею я
SFX G я й [еиу]я
SFX G ня ен [^аезийоуыь]ня
SFX G я ь [аеиоуы]ня
SFX G йня ен йня
SFX G ьня ен ьня
SFX G 0 м я
SFX G 0 ми я
SFX G 0 х я
